Maryland, session 2026, SB0594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
36–101.
(ff) “Social equity applicant” means an applicant for a cannabis license or
cannabis registration that:
(1) has at least [65%] 55% ownership and control held by one or more
individuals who:
(i) have lived in a disproportionately impacted area for at least 5 of
the 10 years immediately preceding the submission of the application;
(ii) attended a public school in a disproportionately impacted area for
at least 5 years; or
(iii) for at least 2 years, attended a 4–year institution of higher
education in the State where at least 40% of the individuals who attend the institution of
higher education are eligible for a Pell Grant; or
(2) meets any other criteria established by the Administration.

SENATE BILL 594 3
36–901.
(a) In this subtitle[, “advertisement”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ADVERTISEMENT” means the publication, dissemination, or
circulation of any auditory, visual, digital, oral, or written matter, which is directly or
indirectly calculated to induce the sale of cannabis or any cannabis–related product or
service.
[(b)] (2) “Advertisement” does not include packaging or labeling.
(C) “THERAPEUTIC OR MEDICAL CLAIM” MEANS A CLAIM THAT EXPLICITLY
STATES A PRODUCT CAN DIAGNOSE, TREAT, MITIGATE, CURE, OR PREVENT A
DISEASE OR CONDITION.
36–902.
An advertisement for cannabis and cannabis products or cannabis–related services
that makes therapeutic or medical claims shall:
(1) be supported by competent and reliable scientific evidence; and
(2) include information on the most serious and most common side effects
or risks associated with the use of cannabis.
36–903.
(a) (1) An advertisement for a cannabis licensee, cannabis product, or
cannabis–related service may not:
(i) violate Title 13, Subtitle 3 of the Commercial Law Article;
(ii) directly [or indirectly] target individuals under the age of 21
years;
(iii) contain a design, an illustration, a picture, or a representation
that:
1. targets [or is attractive to] minors INDIVIDUALS UNDER
THE AGE OF 21 YEARS, including a cartoon character, a mascot, or any other depiction
that is commonly used to market products to minors INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF
21 YEARS;

SENATE BILL 594
2. displays the use of cannabis, including the consumption,
smoking, or vaping of cannabis;
3. encourages or promotes cannabis for use as an intoxicant;
or
4. is obscene;
(iv) engage in advertising by means of television, radio, Internet,
mobile application, social media, or other electronic communication, event sponsorship, or
print publication, unless at least 85% of the audience is reasonably expected to be at least
21 years old as determined [by reliable and current audience composition data] IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION; or
(v) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, engage in
advertising by means of placing an advertisement on the side of a building or another
publicly visible location of any form, including a sign, a poster, a placard, a device, a graphic
display, an outdoor billboard, or a freestanding signboard.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO:
1. EXTERIOR SIGNAGE USED FOR OPERATIONAL
PURPOSES;
2. SIGNS THAT WERE PAINTED ON THE PERMANENT
STRUCTURE OF A CANNABIS BUSINESS PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2026; OR
3. INTERIOR DISPLAYS THAT ARE VISIBLE THROUGH THE
WINDOWS OR DOORS OF A LICENSED PREMISES BUT ARE NOT AFFIXED TO A
PERMANENT STRUCTURE.
(II) A cannabis business may place exterior signage on the premises
of the business for the limited purpose of identifying the business to the public.
(II) (III) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (III) (IV) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE HOLDER OF A STANDARD DISPENSARY LICENSE MAY PLACE
EXTERIOR SIGNAGE, INCLUDING A POSTER OR A PLACARD THAT IS ATTACHED TO
THE BUILDING, OR A FREESTANDING SIGNBOARD THAT IS IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT
TO THE ENTRANCE OF THE LICENSED PREMISES, FOR THE LIMITED PURPOSE OF:
1. IDENTIFYING ITSELF AS A LICENSED CANNABIS
BUSINESS AND A CANNABIS TRUSTED SOURCE;

SENATE BILL 594 5
2. PROVIDING CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE
DISPENSARY, INCLUDING A WEBSITE ADDRESS, PHONE NUMBER, E–MAIL ADDRESS,
OR QUICK RESPONSE (QR) CODE;
3. 2. PROVIDING CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION;
4. 3. PROVIDING INFORMATION ON WHAT TO DO IF AN
ADVERSE EVENT OCCURS, INCLUDING:
A. AN ADVISORY TO CALL 9–1–1 IN AN EMERGENCY;
B. CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE MARYLAND
POISON CENTER; AND
C. CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE PET POISON
HELPLINE; AND
5. 4. IDENTIFYING AN OWNERSHIP OR LICENSURE
DESIGNATION, AS APPROVED BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(III) (IV) EXTERIOR SIGNAGE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) (III)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED:
1. 900 SQUARE INCHES FOR ANY INDIVIDUAL EXTERIOR
SIGN; OR
2. 1,200 SQUARE INCHES TOTAL FOR ALL EXTERIOR
SIGNAGE.
(3) TO DETERMINE WHETHER AN ADVERTISEMENT OR A PROPOSED
ADVERTISEMENT MEETS THE AUDIENCE COMPOSITION REQUIREMENTS UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(I) ACCEPT THE MOST RECENT AND READILY AVAILABLE
AUDIENCE COMPOSITION DATA FROM THE TELEVISION, RADIO, INTERNET, MOBILE
APPLICATION, SOCIAL MEDIA, OR OTHER ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION, EVENT
SPONSORSHIP, OR PRINT PUBLICATION ENTITY WITH WHICH THE CANNABIS
LICENSEE ADVERTISES OR PROPOSES TO ADVERTISE; AND
(II) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, ADOPT REGULATIONS
ESTABLISHING AT LEAST ONE ALTERNATIVE METHOD FOR DETERMINING AUDIENCE
COMPOSITION THAT DEVELOP A PROCESS TO ACCEPT AN ATTESTATION REGARDING

SENATE BILL 594
AUDIENCE COMPOSITION FROM AN ORGANIZER OR HOST OF AN EVENT THAT A
CANNABIS BUSINESS PROPOSES TO ADVERTISE AT THROUGH AN EVENT
SPONSORSHIP.
(b) (1) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, each
cannabis–related website shall employ a neutral age–screening mechanism that verifies
that the user is at least 21 years old, including by using an age–gate, age–screen, or age
verification mechanism before the user may access or view any content and before the
website may collect the user’s address, e–mail address, phone number, or contact
information to disseminate advertisements.
(ii) If a website is appropriate for a qualifying patient who is under
the age of 21 years, the website shall provide an alternative screening mechanism for the
qualifying patient.
(2) An advertisement placed on social media or a mobile application shall
include a notification that an individual must be at least 21 years old to view the content.
(3) The provisions of this subtitle applicable to cannabis licensees may not
be avoided by hiring or contracting with a third–party, or outsourcing advertisements that
do not comply with this subtitle.
(4) (I) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A cannabis licensee may not allow the use of the licensee’s trademarks,
brands, names, locations, or other distinguishing characteristics for third–party use for
advertisements that do not comply with this subtitle.
(II) THE USE OF TRADEMARKS, BRANDS, NAMES, LOCATIONS,
OR OTHER DISTINGUISHING CHARACTERISTICS IN A NEWS ARTICLE, INTERVIEW,
DOCUMENTARY, OR OTHER EDITORIAL CONTENT THAT IS NOT INTENDED AS
COMMERCIAL ADVERTISING IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE PROHIBITION UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TRADEMARK, BRAND, NAME, LOCATION,
OR OTHER DISTINGUISHING CHARACTERISTIC OF A CANNABIS BUSINESS MAY BE
USED IN A NEWS ARTICLE, INTERVIEW, DOCUMENTARY, OR OTHER EDITORIAL
CONTENT IF THE CANNABIS BUSINESS OR A THIRD PARTY ACTING ON BEHALF OF A
CANNABIS BUSINESS DOES NOT PROVIDE COMPENSATION OR ANYTHING ELSE OF
VALUE TO THE PUBLISHER OF THE NEWS ARTICLE, INTERVIEW, DOCUMENTARY, OR
OTHER EDITORIAL CONTENT.
(c) The Administration shall adopt regulations to establish procedures for the
enforcement of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before January 1, 2027,
the Maryland Cannabis Administration shall submit an interim report to the Senate
Finance Committee and the House Economic Matters Committee, and a final report on or

SENATE BILL 594 7
before June 1, 2027, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the
Administration’s:
(1) progress in implementing this Act, including the adoption of regulations
required under this Act;
(2) progress on developing guidance to assist cannabis businesses to comply
with this Act; and
(3) efforts to ensure uniform enforcement of this Act among cannabis
businesses.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.